Hawaii statutes.
[§321‑12.2] Tanning facilities;
minors; penalties. (a) It shall be unlawful for any tanning facility
owner, lessee, or operator to allow any person under the age of eighteen to use
any tanning equipment.

(b) A tanning
facility owner, lessee, or operator shall post in a conspicuous place in each
tanning facility that the individual owns, leases, or operates in this State, a
notice developed by the director of health addressing the following:

(1) That it is unlawful for a tanning facility owner,
lessee, or operator to allow a person under the age of eighteen to use any
tanning equipment;

(2) That any tanning
facility owner, lessee, or operator violating this section shall be subject to
a fine;

(3) That any individual may
report a violation of this section to the individual's local law enforcement
agency; and

(4) The health risks
associated with tanning.

(c) The director of health may impose on a
person who violates this section:

(1) For a first violation, a fine not to exceed $250;
and

(2) For each subsequent violation, a fine not to
exceed $500.

(d) This section
shall not apply to any physician duly licensed to practice medicine who uses,
in the practice of medicine, medical diagnostic and therapeutic equipment that
emits ultraviolet radiation or to any person who owns tanning equipment
exclusively for personal, noncommercial use.

(e) The director of health may adopt rules in
accordance with chapter 91 to implement this section.

(f) As used in this section:

"Operator"
means a person designated by the tanning facility owner or tanning equipment
lessee to operate or assist and instruct in the operation and use of the
tanning facility or tanning equipment.

"Tanning
equipment" means any device that emits electromagnetic radiation with
wavelengths in the air between 200 and 400 nanometers used for tanning of the
skin, including but not limited to sunlamps, tanning booths, or tanning beds.

"Tanning
facility" means any location, place, area, structure, or business that
provides persons access to any tanning equipment, including tanning salons,
health clubs, gyms, apartments, condominiums, and hotels, regardless of whether
a fee is charged for access to the tanning equipment. [L 2014, c 205, §2]

Previous
Vol06_Ch0321-0344
Next